Utah statutes.
41-6a-214.   Quasi-public roads and parking areas -- Local ordinances.

(1)  As used in this section, "quasi-public road or parking area" means a privately owned and maintained road or parking area that is generally held open for use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel or parking.

(2) (a)  Any municipality or county may by ordinance provide that a quasi-public road or parking area within the municipality or county is subject to this chapter.

(b)  An ordinance may not be enacted under this section without:

(i)  a public hearing; and

(ii)  the agreement of a majority of the owners of the quasi-public road or parking area involved.

(3) This section:

(a)  supercedes conflicting provisions under Section 41-6a-215;

(b)  does not require a peace officer to patrol or enforce any provisions of this chapter on any quasi-public road or parking area; or

(c)  does not affect the duty of a peace officer to enforce those provisions of this chapter applicable to private property other than under this section.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

